Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201268-2003
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Children's Health and Treatment Act:

(1) Department
means the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(2) Medical assistance
program means the program established pursuant to section 68-903.

Laws 2012, LB1063, § 3.
July 19, 2012